Alaska, session 34, HB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 15.13.112(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) Except as otherwise provided, campaign contributions held by a candidate 05 or group may be used only to pay the expenses of the candidate or group, and the 06 campaign expenses incurred by the candidate or group, that 07 (1) are security-related expenses permitted under (d) of this 08 section; or 09 (2) reasonably relate to election campaign activities, and in those cases 10 only as authorized by this chapter. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 15.13.112 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 12 (d) A candidate or group may use campaign contributions to pay for security- 13 related expenses reasonably related to the candidate's or group's campaign activities, 14 or that otherwise protect the security of 15 (1) a candidate; 01 (2) a member of a group; 02 (3) a candidate's or group's campaign staff; or 03 (4) a family member of a candidate or of a member of a group. 04 (e) In this section, "security-related expense" includes costs for employing 05 security or other protective personnel, contracting for threat monitoring and detection, 06 acquiring and operating security devices and equipment, protecting a candidate's or 07 group's data and cybersecurity, and, if necessary for the protection of the candidate 08 and members of the candidate's household, using security services and installing or 09 using security equipment at a candidate's personal residence. 10 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.